apertium-xal.xal.twol
Alphabet
 А Ә Б В Г Һ Д Е Ё Ж Җ З И Й К Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
 а ә б в г һ д е ё ж җ з и й к л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф x ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
 
 %{A%}:а !%{A%}:0 %{A%}:ә 
 %{i%}:и 
 %{g%}:г %{g%}:0
 %{G%}:0 !%{G%}:һ
 %{Y%}:у %{Y%}:ү
 %{n%}:н !%{n%}:м %{n%}:0
 %{d%}:д !%{d%}:0
 %{t%}:т !%{t%}:0
 %{O%}:ө %{O%}:0
 %{e%}:е %{e%}:0
 %{a%}:а %{a%}:и
 %{E%}:0
 
 
 %>:0
 % 
 
   ;

Sets

Vowel = A Ә Е Ё И О Ө У Ү Ы Э Ю Я
        а ә е ё и о ө у ү ы э ю я ;

Consonant =  Б В Г Һ Д Ж Җ З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь
             б в г һ д ж җ з й к л м н ң п р с т ф x ц ч ш щ ъ ь ;


FrontV = Ә E И Ө Ү Э
         ә е и ө ү э ; 


!@ д:д ү:ү ү:ү >:0 {G}:һ {i}:и {n}:н {A}:0
!@ т:т ө:ө г:г ə:ə >:0 {G}:һ {A}:ə р:р
!@ с:с а:а м:м >:0 {d}:д {t}:0

Rules

"n gen (1): realize {G} as һ if after a long vowel"
%{G%}:һ <=> :Vowel :Vowel %>: _ ;
	    :Vowel :Consonant :Consonant* :Vowel %>: _ \%{i%}: ;

"n gen (2): realize {i} as null if after a vowel"
%{i%}:0 <=> :Consonant :Vowel :0* _ ;
		:н :0* _ ;

"n gen (3): realize {n} as null if stem ends with н"
%{n%}:0 <=> :н :0* _ ;

"n gen (4): realize {A} as ә if stem contains front vowel"
%{A%}:ә <=> [ :FrontV :Consonant :Consonant* ]/:0* _ ;
	except %{n%}:н _ ;

"n gen (5): delete A"
%{A%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н _ ;

"lengthening"
%{E%}:Vx <=> :Vx _ :Consonant :Consonant* %>: :0* :Vowel ;
 	      where Vx in Vowel ; 

"n dat: realize {t} as null after stems that end in sonorant consonants and vowels"
%{t%}:0 <=> [ :Cx | :Vowel ] %>:0 %{d%}:д _ ;
	where Cx in ( л м н ң ) ;

"n dat: realize {d} as null after obstruent consonants and certain other consonants, indicated below"
%{d%}:0 <=> :Cy %>: _ %{t%}:т ;
	where Cy in ( с ш р г җ) ;
 
"ord: realize {n} as null if before the ordinal suffix"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: :д :г :ч ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
